Mississippi statutes. Title 55. Parks and Recreation
Chapter 7. Bridge and Park Commissions
§ 55-7-57.
Construction of chapter; authority and powers conferred.

This chapter, without reference to any other chapter or statute, shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the establishment of the bridge and park commission of the municipality or of the county, for the performance of any of the powers and duties granted or imposed upon such commission or its officials, and for the issuance of bonds, as provided in this chapter. None of the present restrictions or requirements, additions or limitations of the law applicable to the issuance or sale of bonds by political corporations or subdivisions of the State of Mississippi shall apply to the issuance and sale of bonds under this chapter. No proceedings shall be required for the execution of any of the purposes of this chapter or for the issuance of any bonds pursuant to this chapter other than those provided for and required herein. All powers necessary to be exercised by the governing authorities of the municipality and/or the governing authorities of the county and by the bridge and park commission or its officers or members, in order to carry out the provisions of this chapter, are hereby conferred.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5974-13; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved May 3, 1960).

§ 55-7-59.
Construction of chapter; cumulative and supplemental; repeal or impairment of other laws.

This chapter shall be cumulative and supplemental to other laws having reference to port and harbor development.

This chapter shall not repeal or impair any law now in effect, except as herein specifically provided, and shall be liberally construed so as to accomplish the clear purposes of the chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 5974-01, 5974-14; Laws, 1960, ch. 434, §§ 1, 14; Laws, 1962, ch. 216, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).